Hawaii statutes.
§516-33.5 Deposits by lessees. (a)
The corporation may require the submission of a deposit by any lessee applying
to the corporation for the purchase of a residential lot under this chapter.
The amount of the deposit shall be established by rule. All interests earned
on deposits submitted by lessees shall accrue to the lessees.

(b) The deposit may be applied by the corporation
to payment of appraisal, survey, attorney fees, and any other cost the corporation
has incurred as a result of the designation, with the remainder of the deposit
to be applied toward the purchase of the owner's fee interest. The corporation
shall incur no liability for such deposits under this section. [L 1978, c 140,
§3; am L 1983, c 270, §3; am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1988, c 104, §2; am L
2001, c 60, §3; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next